Maine, session 132, LD4.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §151, as repealed and replaced by PL 2019, c. 268, §1, is amended
to read:
§151. Standard time
1. Standard time. The standard time for the State is the time as determined by 15
United States Code, Sections 260 to 267 except that the standard time year-round for the
State is the time commonly known as eastern daylight standard time or eastern daylight
saving time, referred to in this section as eastern daylight time, if:.
A. Federal law permits the year-round observation of eastern daylight time; and
B. All the states in the eastern time zone and the District of Columbia observe eastern
daylight time year-round.
2. Secretary of State to monitor and provide public notice. The Secretary of State
shall monitor whether the conditions under subsection 1, paragraphs A and B have been
met and provide public notice when each has been met. When both conditions under
subsection 1, paragraphs A and B have been met, the Secretary of State shall issue a public
notice announcing the effective date of year-round eastern daylight time as established in
subsection 3.
3. Effective date. Year-round eastern daylight time is effective immediately upon the
fulfillment of both conditions in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B if the State is observing
eastern daylight time on the date both conditions are met. Year-round eastern daylight time
is effective on the next start date of eastern daylight time after both conditions in subsection
1, paragraphs A and B have been met if the State is not observing eastern daylight time on
the date both of the conditions are met.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §6440, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2001, c. 123, §1, is further
amended to read:
2. Weekends. During the period from 4 p.m., Eastern Daylight Savings Time,
Saturday, to 1/2 hour before sunrise the following Monday morning from June 1st to
August 31st, both days inclusive, except that it is lawful to raise or haul traps during this
period if a hurricane warning issued by the National Weather Service is in effect for any
coastal waters of the State.